test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TI-kataw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - kâtâw - asfd : # Wolvengrey VTI2 verb; Wolvengrey p. 400; Fut+Def from Okimāsis pp. 73-74 


     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+1Sg: nikâtân
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kikâtân
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+3Sg: kâtâw
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl: kâtâyiwa
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+1Pl: nikâtânân
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+12Pl: [kikâtânaw, kikâtânânaw]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kikâtânâwâw
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+3Pl: kâtâwak
     
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prt+1Sg: [nikî-kâtân, nikîkâtân] 
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prt+2Sg: [kikî-kâtân, kikîkâtân]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kî-kâtâw, kîkâtâw]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prt+4Sg/Pl: [kî-kâtâyiwa, kîkâtâyiwa]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prt+1Pl: [nikî-kâtânân, nikîkâtânân]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prt+12Pl: [kikî-kâtânaw, kikîkâtânaw, kikîkâtânânaw, kikî-kâtânânaw]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prt+2Pl: [kikî-kâtânâwâw, kikîkâtânâwâw]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prt+3Pl: [kî-kâtâwak, kîkâtâwak]
     
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg: [nika-kâtân, nikakâtân]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg: [kika-kâtân, kikakâtân]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg: [ka-kâtâw, kakâtâw]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Def+4Sg/Pl: [ka-kâtâyiwa, kakâtâyiwa]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl: [nika-kâtânân, nikakâtânân]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl: [kika-kâtânaw, kikakâtânaw, kika-kâtânânaw, kikakâtânânaw]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl: [kika-kâtânâwâw,kikakâtânâwâw] 
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Def+3Pl: [ka-kâtâwak, kakâtâwak]
     
     
     
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [ê-kâtâyân, êkâtâyân]
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [ê-kâtâyan, êkâtâyan]
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-kâtât, êkâtât]
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl: [ê-kâtâyit, êkâtâyit]
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [ê-kâtâyâhk, êkâtâyâhk]
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [ê-kâtâyahk, êkâtâyahk]
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [ê-kâtâyêk, êkâtâyêk]
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-kâtâcik, êkâtâcik]
     
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+1Sg: [ê-kî-kâtâyân, êkîkâtâyân]
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+2Sg: [ê-kî-kâtâyan, êkîkâtâyan]
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+3Sg: [ê-kî-kâtât, êkîkâtât]
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+4Sg/Pl: [ê-kî-kâtâyit, êkîkâtâyit]
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+1Pl: [ê-kî-kâtâyâhk, êkîkâtâyâhk]
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+12Pl: [ê-kî-kâtâyahk, êkîkâtâyahk]
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+2Pl: [ê-kî-kâtâyêk, êkîkâtâyêk]
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+3Pl: [ê-kî-kâtâcik, êkîkâtâcik]
     
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Sg: [ê-wî-kâtâyân, êwîkâtâyân]
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Sg: [ê-wî-kâtâyan, êwîkâtâyan]
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+3Sg: [ê-wî-kâtât, êwîkâtât]
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl: [ê-wî-kâtâyit, êwîkâtâyit]
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Pl: [ê-wî-kâtâyâhk, êwîkâtâyâhk]
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+12Pl: [ê-wî-kâtâyahk, êwîkâtâyahk]
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Pl: [ê-wî-kâtâyêk, êwîkâtâyêk]
     PV/e+kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+3Pl: [ê-wî-kâtâcik, êwîkâtâcik]
     
     
     
     
     
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg: [niwî-kâtân, niwîkâtân]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg: [kiwî-kâtân, kiwîkâtân]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg: [wî-kâtâw, wîkâtâw]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl: [wî-kâtâyiwa, wîkâtâyiwa]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl: [niwî-kâtânân, niwîkâtânân]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl: [kiwî-kâtânaw, kiwîkâtânaw, kiwî-kâtânânaw, kiwîkâtânânaw]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl: [kiwî-kâtânâwâw, kiwîkâtânâwâw]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl: [wî-kâtâwak, wîkâtâwak]
     
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [kâtâyân, kâtâyân]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [kâtâyan, kâtâyan]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [kâtât, kâtât]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl: [kâtâyit, kâtâyit]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [kâtâyâhk, kâtâyâhk]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [kâtâyahk, kâtâyahk]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [kâtâyêk, kâtâyêk]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [kâtâcik, kâtâcik]
     
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+1Sg: [kî-kâtâyân, kîkâtâyân]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+2Sg: [kî-kâtâyan, kîkâtâyan]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+3Sg: [kî-kâtât, kîkâtât]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+4Sg/Pl: [kî-kâtâyit, kîkâtâyit]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+1Pl: [kî-kâtâyâhk, kîkâtâyâhk]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+12Pl: [kî-kâtâyahk, kîkâtâyahk]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+2Pl: [kî-kâtâyêk, kîkâtâyêk]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+3Pl: [kî-kâtâcik, kîkâtâcik]
     
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Sg: [wî-kâtâyân, wîkâtâyân]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Sg: [wî-kâtâyan, wîkâtâyan]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+3Sg: [wî-kâtât, wîkâtât]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl: [wî-kâtâyit, wîkâtâyit]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Pl: [wî-kâtâyâhk, wîkâtâyâhk]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+12Pl: [wî-kâtâyahk, wîkâtâyahk]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Pl: [wî-kâtâyêk, wîkâtâyêk]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Fut+Int+3Pl: [wî-kâtâcik, wîkâtâcik]
     
     
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Rel+Fut+Int+1Sg: [wî-wîci-kâtâmiyân, wîwîcikâtâmiyân]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg: [wî-wîci-kâtâmiyan, wîwîcikâtâmiyan]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Rel+Fut+Int+3Sg: [wî-wîci-kâtâmit, wîwîcikâtâmit]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Rel+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl: [wî-wîci-kâtâmiyit, wîwîcikâtâmiyit]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Rel+Fut+Int+1Pl: [wî-wîci-kâtâmiyâhk, wîwîcikâtâmiyâhk]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Rel+Fut+Int+12Pl: [wî-wîci-kâtâmiyahk, wîwîcikâtâmiyahk]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Rel+Fut+Int+2Pl: [wî-wîci-kâtâmiyêk, wîwîcikâtâmiyêk]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Rel+Fut+Int+3Pl: [wî-wîci-kâtâmicik, wîwîcikâtâmicik]
     
     

     kâtâw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+1Sg: kâtâyâni
     kâtâw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+2Sg: kâtâyani
     kâtâw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+3Sg: kâtâci
     kâtâw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl: kâtâyici
     kâtâw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+1Pl: kâtâyâhki
     kâtâw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+12Pl: [kâtâyahko, kâtâyahki]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+2Pl: kâtâyêko
     kâtâw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+3Pl: kâtâtwâwi

     kâtâw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: kâtâ
     kâtâw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: kâtâtân
     kâtâw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: kâtâk
     
     kâtâw+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Sg: kâtâhkan
     kâtâw+V+TI+Imp+Del+12Pl: kâtâhkahk
     kâtâw+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Pl: kâtâhkêk
